Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 26.5 Property Assessed Clean Energy Program

39-26.5-1.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared:

Investing in energy efficiency and renewable energy improvements is financially beneficial over time, as well as good for the environment;

Upfront costs are a barrier to investments in major energy improvements for both commercial and residential property owners;

There are few financing options available that combine easy qualification, an attractive interest rate, and a relatively long repayment term;

Property-Assessed Clean Energy, hereinafter referred to as PACE, is a voluntary financing mechanism that allows both residential and commercial property owners to access affordable, long-term financing for renewable energy and energy-efficiency upgrades including, but not limited to, system-reliability upgrades, alternative fuel infrastructure upgrades, and other eligible environmental health and environmental safety upgrades on their property;

PACE financing offers incremental, special-assessment payments that are low and fixed for up to twenty (20) years, with no upfront costs; the PACE special-assessment fees transfer to the new owner when a property is sold, or the assessment obligation can be paid in full at transfer; and electricity and fuel bills are lower than they would be without the improvements; and

PACE financing will create a means for Rhode Island cities and towns to provide a mechanism to increase community sustainability, greenhouse gas emissions reductions, and meet other energy goals and will also provide a valuable service to the citizens of their communities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9.

39-26.5-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

“Commercial property” means a property operated for commercial purposes, or a residential property that contains five (5) or more housing units.

“Distributed-generation system” means an electrical-generation facility located in the electric distribution company’s load zone with a nameplate capacity no greater than five megawatts (5 MW), using eligible renewable energy resources as defined by §

39-26-5

, including biogas created as a result of anaerobic digestion, but, specifically excluding all other listed eligible biomass fuels, and connected to an electrical power system owned, controlled, or operated by the electric distribution company.

“Dwelling” means a residential structure or mobile home that contains one to four (4) family housing units, or individual units of condominiums or cooperatives.

“Eligible net-metering system” means a facility generating electricity as defined in §

39-26.4-2

.

“Eligible renewable energy resources” means resources as defined in §

39-26-5

.

“Energy-efficiency projects” means those projects that are eligible under §

39-1-27.7

or projects that have been defined as eligible in the PACE rules and regulations.

“Institution” means a private entity or quasi-state agency.

“Loan loss reserve fund” or “(LRF)” means funds set aside to cover losses in the event of loan defaults.

“Municipality” or “towns and cities” means any Rhode Island town or city with powers set forth in title 45.

“Net metering” means using electricity as defined in §

39-26.4-2

.

“PACE assessment” or “assessment” means the special assessment placed on a PACE property owner’s property tax or other municipal assessment bill in accordance with this chapter, to be collected by or on behalf of the PACE municipality in which that PACE property is located and remitted to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or to the lender that has financed that PACE project. The PACE assessment shall be owed by the current owner of the related PACE property as of the time each PACE assessment comes due. In the event of a transfer of ownership, all PACE assessments coming due after the date of the transfer, by foreclosure or otherwise, shall be owed by the transferee.

“PACE lien” means the non-accelerating lien placed on a PACE property in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank pursuant to this chapter, in order to secure the repayment of a PACE assessment made in connection with that PACE property and to secure the repayment of each PACE assessment to be made by that PACE property owner as each assessment comes due.

“PACE municipality” means a municipality voluntarily designated by its city or town council as a property-assessed clean energy municipality.

“PACE project” or “project” means a distinct installation of an eligible energy-efficiency system, renewable energy net-metering system, distributed-generation system, alternative fuel infrastructure upgrade, and/or other eligible environmental health and environmental safety upgrades.

“PACE property” or “property” means any residential property or commercial property that is the subject of an approved application for a PACE project filed pursuant to this chapter.

“Past-due balances” means the sum of the due and unpaid assessments on a PACE property as of the time the ownership of that PACE property is transferred. “Past-due balances” does not mean the unaccelerated balance of the PACE loan at the time that property is transferred.

“Property-assessed clean energy” or “PACE” is a voluntary financing mechanism that allows both residential and commercial property owners to access affordable, long-term financing for energy upgrades, and other eligible environmental health and environmental safety upgrades on their property.

“Rhode Island infrastructure bank” means the Rhode Island infrastructure bank (“RIIB”). For the purposes of this chapter, Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall include other related state agencies and/or third-party administrators, as may be engaged by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank for the purposes of providing the services envisioned by the rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with §

39-26.5-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9; P.L. 2017, ch. 480, § 3.

39-26.5-3.
Property-Assessed Clean Energy Municipality.

A town or city council by resolution may designate the municipality as a “PACE municipality.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9.

39-26.5-4.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 10, effective June 30, 2015.

39-26.5-4.1.
Financing agreements — PACE assessments — PACE liens.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank or a third-party capital provider may enter into a financing agreement with a qualifying PACE property owner. After such agreement is entered into, and upon notice from the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, the PACE municipality shall: (i) Place a caveat on the land records indicating that a PACE assessment and lien is anticipated upon completion of the PACE project for such property; or (ii) At the direction of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, levy the PACE assessment and file a lien on the land records on the estimated costs of the PACE project prior to the completion or upon the completion of said PACE project.

PACE assessments levied pursuant to this chapter and the interest, fees, and any penalties thereon shall constitute a lien against the qualifying PACE property on which they are made until they are paid. The lien shall be collected in the same manner as the property taxes of the PACE municipality on real property, including, in the event of default or delinquency, with respect to any penalties, fees, and remedies. Each lien may be recorded and released in the manner provided for property tax liens and if the property is commercial property as defined herein, it shall be subject to the consent of existing mortgage holders. The PACE lien shall take precedence over all other liens or encumbrances except a lien for taxes of the municipality on real property, or if the subject property is residential property as defined herein, the PACE lien shall be subject to any prior recorded mortgage which lien for taxes or pre-recorded residential mortgage shall have priority over the PACE-assessment lien. To the extent PACE assessments are paid in installments and any such installment is not paid when due, the PACE-assessment lien may be foreclosed to the extent of any unpaid installment payments and any penalties, interest, and fees related thereto. In the event the PACE-assessment lien is foreclosed, the PACE-assessment lien shall survive the judgment of foreclosure to the extent of any unpaid installment payments of the PACE assessment secured by the PACE-assessment lien that were not the subject of such judgment.

Any PACE municipality may assign to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank any and all liens filed by the PACE municipality, as provided in the written agreement between the participating municipality and the Rhode Island infrastructure bank. The Rhode Island infrastructure bank may sell or assign, for consideration, any and all liens received from the participating municipality. The consideration received by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall be negotiated between the Rhode Island infrastructure bank and the assignee. The assignee or assignees of the liens shall have and possess the same powers and rights at law or in equity as the Rhode Island infrastructure bank and the participating municipality and its tax collector would have had if the lien had not been assigned with regard to the precedence and priority of the lien, the accrual of interest, and the fees and expenses of collection. The assignee shall have the same rights to enforce the liens as any private party holding a lien on real property, including, but not limited to, foreclosure and a suit on the debt. Costs and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the assignee as a result of any foreclosure action or other legal proceeding brought pursuant to this section and directly related to the proceeding shall be taxed in the proceeding against each person having title to any property subject to the proceedings. The costs and fees may be collected by the assignee at any time after demand for payment has been made by the assignee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9; P.L. 2017, ch. 480, § 3.

39-26.5-5.
Rights of PACE property owners.

A PACE property owner may enter into a contract for the installation or construction of a project relating to renewable energy as defined in §

39-26-5

, or relating to energy efficiency as defined in §

39-1-27.7

or as defined by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank pursuant to regulations authorized under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9.

39-26.5-6.
Priority of PACE lien.

A PACE lien on a residential property shall be: subordinate to all liens on the residential property in existence at the time the residential PACE lien is filed; subordinate to a first mortgage on the residential property recorded after the PACE lien is filed; and superior to any other lien on the residential property recorded after the PACE lien is filed. This subsection shall not affect the status or priority of any other municipal or statutory lien.

At the time of a transfer of property ownership of a residential property, including by foreclosure, the past-due balances of any special assessment under this chapter shall be due for payment. In the event of a foreclosure action, the past-due balances shall include all payments on a PACE assessment that are due and unpaid as of the date of the foreclosure. Unless otherwise agreed by the PACE lender, all payments on the PACE assessment that become due after the date of transfer by foreclosure or otherwise shall continue to be secured by a PACE lien on the PACE property and shall be the responsibility of the transferee.

A PACE lien on a commercial property shall be: senior to all liens on the commercial property in existence at the time the PACE lien is filed, subject to the consent of the existing mortgage holders on the property; senior to all liens filed or recorded after the time the PACE lien is created; but junior to a municipal tax lien.

At the time of a transfer of property ownership of a commercial property, including by tax sale, in accordance with §

44-9-32

, or foreclosure, the past-due balances of any PACE assessment under this chapter shall be due for payment. Unless otherwise agreed by the PACE lender, all payments of PACE assessments that become due after the date of transfer by tax sale, in accordance with §

44-9-32

, or foreclosure, or otherwise shall be secured by a PACE lien on the PACE property and shall be the responsibility of the transferee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9; P.L. 2017, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 261, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 480, § 3.

39-26.5-7.
Administration of PACE — Loan loss reserve fund.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank is hereby authorized to create, set up on its books, and administer one or more PACE funds for the purpose of providing financial assistance to residential and commercial property owners for PACE projects. Additionally, the Rhode Island infrastructure bank may enter into an agreement, with one or more approved institutions, to create one or more loan loss reserve funds (LRF) or other financing mechanisms to provide financial incentives or additional security for PACE projects.

In the event that there is a foreclosure of a PACE property and the proceeds resulting from such a foreclosure are insufficient to pay the past-due balances on the associated PACE assessment, after all superior liens have been satisfied, payment from the LRF shall be made in the amount of the past-due balances on the PACE assessment. The LRF shall be administered by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or by the institution selected by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank; in the latter case the Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall provide oversight of the LRF.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 20.

39-26.5-8.
Assistance to municipalities.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall:

Publish on its website a list of the types of PACE-eligible energy efficiency, renewable energy, and other projects as defined in rules and regulations promulgated under §

39-26.5-11

;

Provide information concerning implementation of this chapter to each municipality that requests such information;

Offer administrative and technical assistance to any PACE municipality that voluntarily participates in the PACE program; and

Develop and offer informational resources to help residents make best use of the PACE program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9.

39-26.5-9.
Monitoring, reporting, compliance, underwriting criteria.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall determine compliance with the underwriting criteria, standards, and procedures set forth in the rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with this chapter and shall include an accounting of the PACE program in the annual report due each year under §

46-12.2-24.1

. The report shall describe the implementation and operation of the PACE program including program receipts, disbursements, and earnings.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9.

39-26.5-10.
Operations.

The PACE program shall operate in accordance with all generally accepted banking practices and real estate practices, except as specifically stated within.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1.

39-26.5-11.
Rules and regulations.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall consult with the office of energy resources to promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with this section, and in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42. Such rules and regulations should ensure that the PACE program does not adversely affect the implementation of any other energy program in whose coordination the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or the office of energy resources is involved. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The necessary application requirements and procedures for any residential property owner or commercial property owner seeking PACE financing;

The necessary qualifications and requirements for a proposed PACE project;

The underwriting criteria to be applied in determining the eligibility of properties and property owners for PACE projects; and

Requirements that all existing lien holders on a property be given notice prior to a PACE assessment and lien being filed in connection with that property and that all commercial property owners seeking a commercial PACE loan receive consent of the existing mortgage holders on that property prior to being eligible.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall be responsible for promulgating agreements, forms, and other documents necessary for the efficient administration of the PACE program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 361, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 9; P.L. 2017, ch. 480, § 3.